Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.40.020

Request for ballot from an overseas voter or service voter.

(1) A request for a ballot from an overseas voter or service voter must include the address of the last residence in the state of Washington.

(2) No person, organization, or association may distribute any ballot materials that contain a return address other than that of the appropriate county auditor.

[ 2011 c 10 s 36; 2009 c 369 s 37; 2003 c 111 s 1002; 2001 c 241 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.36.220.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.